Alaska statutes. Title 21. Insurance.
Chapter 86. Health Maintenance Organizations.

Sec. 21.86.010.
Establishment of health maintenance organizations.

A person may apply to the director for and obtain a certificate of authority to establish and operate a health maintenance organization in compliance with this chapter. A person may not establish or operate a health maintenance organization in this state unless the person obtains a certificate of authority under this chapter. A foreign corporation may, subject to its registration, qualify under this chapter to do business in this state as a foreign corporation.

An application for a certificate of authority must be verified by an officer or authorized representative of the applicant, must be in a form prescribed by the director, and must contain or be accompanied by

a copy of the organizational documents of the applicant, including the articles of incorporation, articles of association, partnership agreement, trust agreement, or other applicable documents, and all amendments to the documents;

a copy of the bylaws, regulations, or similar document, if any, regulating the conduct of the internal affairs of the applicant;

a list of the names, addresses, and official positions of the persons who are responsible for the conduct of the affairs of the applicant, including all members of the board of directors, board of trustees, executive committee, or other governing board or committee, the principal officers in the case of a corporation, and the partners or members in the case of a partnership or association;

a copy of contracts made or to be made between the applicant and providers or between the applicant and persons listed in (3) of this subsection;

a copy of the form of evidence of coverage that is to be issued to the enrollees;

a copy of the form or group contract, if any, that is to be issued to employers, unions, trustees, or other organizations;

financial statements showing the applicant’s assets, liabilities, and sources of financial support; if the applicant’s financial affairs are audited by independent certified public accountants, a copy of the applicant’s most recent certified financial statement satisfies the requirement of this paragraph unless the director finds that additional or more recent financial information is required for the proper administration of this chapter;

a description of the proposed method of marketing, a financial plan that includes a projection of operating results anticipated until the organization has had net income for at least one year, and a statement as to the sources of working capital as well as any other sources of funding;

a power of attorney executed by the applicant, if not domiciled in this state, appointing the director and the director’s successors in office, and authorized deputies, as the true and lawful attorney of the applicant in and for this state, upon whom all lawful process in any legal action or proceeding against the health maintenance organization, on a cause of action arising in this state, may be served;

a statement reasonably describing the geographic area or areas to be served;

a description of the complaint procedures to be used, as required under AS

21.86.100

;

as required by regulations adopted by the director, a description of the procedures and programs to be implemented to assure compliance with state and federal statutes and regulations regarding the quality of health care;

a description of the mechanism by which enrollees will be afforded an opportunity to participate in matters of policy and operation under AS

21.86.040

;

the deposit required under AS

21.86.140(b)

;

other information that the director requires in order to make a determination under AS

21.86.020

;

the application fee prescribed under AS

21.06.250

.

An applicant, or a health maintenance organization holding a certificate of authority granted under this chapter, shall, unless otherwise provided for, file a notice describing any material modification of the organization’s operation as described in the information submitted under (b) of this section. The notice shall be filed with the director before the modification. If the director does not disapprove the modification within 30 days after the filing of the notice, the modification is considered approved. The director may adopt regulations exempting from the filing requirements of this subsection those items that the director considers unnecessary to report.

An applicant, or a health maintenance organization holding a certificate of authority granted under this chapter, shall file with the director all contracts of reinsurance. An agreement between the organization and an insurer is subject to the laws of this state regarding reinsurance. All reinsurance agreements and modifications to a reinsurance agreement shall be filed with the director and must be approved by the director. A reinsurance agreement remains in full force and effect for at least 90 days following written notice to the director, by registered mail, of cancellation by either party.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1990)

Sec. 21.86.020.
Issuance of certificate of authority; approval of changes.

Within 10 days after receipt of an application for a certificate of authority, the director shall forward a copy of the application to the commissioner of health and social services. Within 60 days after the commissioner of health and social services receives the copy of the application, the commissioner shall make a recommendation regarding the granting of the certificate of authority.

The director shall either issue or deny a certificate of authority within 30 days after receipt of the commissioner of health and social services’ recommendation. However, the director may extend the time for issuance or denial of a certificate of authority if additional information is needed in order to make a decision, and notice of the extension is provided to the applicant by the 90th day after the director received the application. A certificate of authority shall be issued if the director determines that the following conditions are met:

the persons responsible for the conduct of the affairs of the applicant are competent and trustworthy;

the applicant will effectively provide or arrange for the provision of basic health care services on a prepaid basis, through insurance or otherwise, except to the extent of reasonable requirements for copayments;

the applicant is financially responsible and may reasonably be expected to meet its obligations to enrollees and prospective enrollees; in determining if this condition is met, the director may consider

the financial soundness of the arrangements for health care services and the schedule of charges used in connection with those services;

the adequacy of working capital;

an agreement with an insurer, a hospital or medical service corporation, a government, or other organization for ensuring the payment of the cost of health care services or providing for automatic applicability of an alternative coverage if the health maintenance organization is discontinued;

an agreement with providers for the provision of health care services; and

a deposit of cash or securities submitted under AS

21.86.140

;

the enrollees will be afforded an opportunity to participate in matters of policy and operation as provided in AS

21.86.040

;

nothing in the proposed method of operation, as shown by the information submitted under AS

21.86.010

or by independent investigation, is contrary to the public interest;

the information submitted under AS

21.86.010(b)(12)

indicates that the applicant will be able to comply with state and federal statutes and regulations regarding the quality of health care.

If a certificate of authority is denied under this section, the applicant may request a hearing under AS

21.86.200

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1990)

Sec. 21.86.030.
Powers of a health maintenance organization.

A health maintenance organization may

purchase, lease, construct, renovate, operate, or maintain hospitals, other health care facilities, their ancillary equipment, and property reasonably required for its principal office or for purposes necessary in the transaction of the business of the organization;

make loans to a medical group under contract with it in furtherance of its program, or make loans to a corporation or corporations under its control for the purpose of acquiring or constructing medical facilities and hospitals or in furtherance of a program providing health care services to enrollees;

furnish health care services through providers that are under contract with or employed by the health maintenance organization;

contract with a person for the performance, on the organization’s behalf, of certain functions such as marketing, enrollment, and administration;

contract with an insurance company licensed in this state, or with a hospital or medical service corporation authorized to do business in this state, for the provision of insurance, indemnity, or reimbursement against the cost of health care services provided by the health maintenance organization;

offer other health care services, in addition to basic health care services.

A health maintenance organization shall file a notice and adequate supporting information with the director before the exercise of a power granted in (a)(1), (2), or (4) of this section. The director may disapprove the exercise of a power only if, in the director’s opinion, it would substantially and adversely affect the financial soundness of the health maintenance organization and endanger its ability to meet its obligations. If the director does not disapprove the exercise of power within 30 days after the filing of the notice, it is considered approved. The director may adopt regulations exempting from the filing requirement of this section those activities having a minimal effect on the health maintenance organization.

Nothing in this section relieves a health maintenance organization that wishes to exercise the power described in (a)(1) of this section from the requirements of

AS 18.07, regarding obtaining a certificate of need;

AS 47.32, regarding regulation of hospitals; and

other statutes applicable to hospitals or other health care facilities.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1990; am § 12 ch 57 SLA 2005)

Sec. 21.86.040.
Governing body; enrollee participation.

The governing body of a health maintenance organization may include providers, or other individuals, or both. At least one-third of the governing body must consist of consumers who are substantially representative of enrollees.

The governing body of a health maintenance organization shall establish a mechanism to afford its enrollees an opportunity to participate in matters of policy and operation through the establishment of advisory panels, by the use of advisory referenda on major policy decisions, or through the use of other mechanisms.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1990)

Sec. 21.86.045.
Biographical affidavits.

A domestic health maintenance organization shall file with the director a complete affidavit of biographical information not later than 30 days after the appointment of an officer or member of the governing body of the organization. If requested by the director, a foreign health maintenance organization shall file with the director an affidavit of biographical information for the appointment of an officer or member of the governing body of that organization. A filing under this section must be on a form approved by the director. A filing is not required if a biographical affidavit of the officer or member of the governing body of the organization has been submitted to the director within one year before the date of appointment. A biographical affidavit filed under this section is confidential and not subject to public inspection.

History.

(§ 91 ch 23 SLA 2011)

Sec. 21.86.050.
Fiduciary responsibility.

A director, officer, employee, or partner of a health maintenance organization who receives, collects, disburses, or invests money in connection with the activities of that organization is responsible for that money in a fiduciary relationship to the organization.

A health maintenance organization shall maintain in force a fidelity bond on employees and officers in an amount not less than $100,000 or another amount prescribed by the director. The bond must be written with at least a one-year discovery period and, if written with less than a three-year discovery period, must contain a provision that cancellation or termination of the bond, whether by or at the request of the insured or by the underwriter, does not take effect sooner than 90 days after written notice of cancellation or termination has been filed with the director, unless an earlier cancellation or termination date is approved by the director.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1990)

Sec. 21.86.060.
Provision of services.

A health maintenance organization may provide provider services directly, through provider employees, or may provide the services under arrangements with individual providers or one or more groups of providers.

In addition to basic health care services, a health maintenance organization may provide, or arrange for, other health care services on a prepayment or other financial basis.

Health care services may be provided only by appropriately licensed health care providers.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1990; am § 2 ch 60 SLA 1998)

Sec. 21.86.070.
Evidence of coverage; charges for health care services.

An enrollee residing in this state is entitled to evidence of coverage. If an enrollee obtains coverage from an insurance policy or from a subscriber contract issued by a hospital or medical service corporation, whether by option or otherwise, the insurer or hospital or medical service corporation shall issue the evidence of coverage; otherwise, the health maintenance organization shall issue the evidence of coverage. Each subsequent change in coverage must be evidenced in a separate document issued to the enrollee.

Except as provided in (d) of this section, evidence of coverage, or an amendment or endorsement to coverage, may not be issued or delivered to a person in this state until a copy of the form of the evidence of coverage, amendment, or endorsement has been filed with and approved by the director. A filing shall be made not less than 30 days before the intended date of delivery or issuance. The form of evidence of coverage, amendment, or endorsement is considered approved 30 days after it was filed, unless it is affirmatively approved or disapproved by an order of the director before the expiration of the 30-day period. If the form of evidence of coverage, amendment, or endorsement is disapproved, the director’s order must specify the reasons for disapproval. A hearing shall be granted to a person aggrieved by either an approval or disapproval under this subsection if a written request is made by that person to the director. The hearing shall be granted within 30 days after the receipt of the written request.

An evidence of coverage

may not contain a provision or statement that is unjust, unfair, inequitable, misleading, deceptive, or encourages misrepresentation, or that is untrue, misleading, or prohibited under AS

21.86.150

; and

must contain a clear and concise statement if a contract, or a reasonably complete summary if a certificate, of

the health care services and the insurance or other benefits, if any, to which the enrollee is entitled;

limitations on the services, kind of services, benefits, or kind of benefits, to be provided, including a deductible or copayment feature;

where, and in what manner, information is available as to how services may be obtained;

the total amount of payment for health care services and the indemnity or service benefits, if any, that the enrollee is obligated to pay with respect to individual contracts;

the health maintenance organization’s method for resolving enrollee complaints; and

guidelines explaining when treatment may be denied.

If a form of the evidence of coverage, or an amendment or endorsement to it, is subject to the jurisdiction of the director under AS

21.42.120

and

21.42.130

, or under AS

21.87.180

, the filing requirements of (b) of this section do not apply. If a form of evidence of coverage, or an amendment or endorsement to it, is subject to AS

21.42.120

and

21.42.130

, or to AS

21.87.180

, those applicable provisions, as well as (c) of this section, apply to the content of the form of evidence of coverage, amendment, or endorsement.

A schedule of charges for enrollee coverage for health care services, or an amendment or endorsement to it, may not be used until a copy of the schedule has been filed with and approved by the director. A filing shall be made not less than 30 days before its proposed use. The schedule of charges, amendment, or endorsement is considered approved 30 days after it was filed unless it was affirmatively approved or disapproved by an order of the director before the expiration of the 30-day period. If a schedule of charges, amendment, or endorsement is disapproved, the director’s order must specify the reasons for disapproval. A hearing shall be granted to a person aggrieved by either an approval or disapproval under this subsection if a written request is made by that person to the director. The hearing shall be granted within 30 days after receipt of the written request.

A schedule of charges, or an amendment or endorsement to it, shall be established according to sound actuarial principles for various categories of enrollees, but charges applicable to an enrollee may not be individually determined based on that enrollee’s health status. The charges may not be excessive, inadequate, nor unfairly discriminatory. Certification by an actuary who is a member in good standing of the American Academy of Actuaries or another person who is considered qualified by the director, as to the appropriateness of the application of the charges, based on reasonable assumptions, must accompany each filing under (e) of this section, along with adequate supporting information.

The director may require that additional relevant material considered necessary by the director be submitted in order to determine the acceptability of a filing made under either (b) or (e) of this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1990; am § 3 ch 60 SLA 1998)

Administrative Code. —

For filing procedure for forms, rates, manuals, rating plans, and rules, see 3 AAC 31, art. 2.

Sec. 21.86.075.
Chiropractic health care services.

An enrollee may use the services of a licensed chiropractor of the enrollee’s choosing and may not be required to obtain the prior approval of the enrollee’s health maintenance organization, a gatekeeper, or primary care physician. Within 10 days after an enrollee’s first visit, a chiropractor shall transmit a report containing the enrollee’s primary complaint, related history, examination findings, initial diagnosis, and treatment plan to the enrollee’s health maintenance organization. If the enrollee and the enrollee’s chiropractor determine that the condition of the enrollee has not improved within 30 days after the initial treatment, the chiropractor shall refer the enrollee back to the enrollee’s health maintenance organization for examination and possible concurrent care.

If the enrollee’s chiropractor recommends chiropractic treatment beyond 30 days, the chiropractor shall conduct a second examination and transmit the findings to the enrollee’s health maintenance organization. The transmitted information must include the enrollee’s current status regarding the primary complaint, the progress of a revised treatment plan, and the objectives for continued care.

After receiving a 30-day treatment report from a chiropractor under (b) of this section, the enrollee’s health maintenance organization may request a review by another chiropractor. The reviewing chiropractor shall conduct a physical examination of the enrollee. The findings of the reviewing chiropractor must be disclosed to the enrollee and the enrollee’s chiropractor. Charges for additional chiropractic care recommended by the reviewing chiropractor must be included as covered health care services provided by the health maintenance organization.

If the enrollee’s treating chiropractor and the reviewing chiropractor determine that the enrollee’s condition has stabilized, ongoing preventative or maintenance care is limited to two chiropractic visits a month. If the treating chiropractor and the reviewing chiropractor disagree on the enrollee’s continued treatment, the enrollee and the health maintenance organization shall jointly select a third chiropractor to review the enrollee’s chiropractic treatment. Selection of a third chiropractor must occur not more than 60 days after the date of the enrollee’s initial treatment by the enrollee’s treating chiropractor. Until the third chiropractor’s opinion is received in writing by the enrollee and the health maintenance organization, the enrollee may receive chiropractic treatment recommended by the treating chiropractor. The opinion of the third chiropractor as to continued chiropractic treatment is binding on the enrollee and the health maintenance organization. This subsection does not apply if a new documented injury or a substantial exacerbation of the enrollee’s previous primary complaint occurs.

History.

(§ 4 ch 60 SLA 1998)

Sec. 21.86.078.
Choice of health care provider.

A health maintenance organization shall offer to every enrollee a point-of-service plan option that would allow a covered person to receive covered services from an out-of-network health care provider without obtaining a referral or prior authorization from the health maintenance organization. The point-of-service plan option may require that an enrollee pay a higher deductible or copayment and higher premium for the plan.

A health maintenance organization shall provide each enrollee with an opportunity at the time of enrollment and during the annual open enrollment period to enroll in the point-of-service plan option. The health maintenance organization shall provide written notice of the point-of-service plan option to each enrollee and shall include in that notice a detailed explanation of the financial costs to be incurred by an enrollee who selects that option.

History.

(§ 4 ch 60 SLA 1998)

Sec. 21.86.080.
Annual statement; additional reports.

A health maintenance organization shall file an annual statement with the director under AS

21.09.200

and shall provide a copy to the commissioner of health and social services. The annual statement shall be verified by at least two principal officers of the organization. The director may require additional reports that are reasonably necessary and appropriate in order for the director or the commissioner of health and social services to carry out the duties prescribed by this chapter.

The director may require a health maintenance organization to file quarterly financial statements. If quarterly financial statements are required, the statements must follow for a given quarter the reporting specified in the quarterly financial statement blank form and instructions most recently approved by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners.

A filing under this section is subject to AS

21.09.200

and

21.09.205

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1990; am § 105 ch 62 SLA 1995)

Sec. 21.86.087.
[Renumbered as AS 21.06.087.]

Sec. 21.86.090.
Information to enrollees.

A health maintenance organization shall promptly notify its enrollees of a material change in its operation that would directly affect the enrollees.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1990)

Sec. 21.86.100.
Complaint system; report.

A health maintenance organization shall establish and maintain a complaint system to provide reasonable procedures for the resolution of written complaints initiated by its enrollees. A complaint system must provide a procedure for forwarding to the commissioner of health and social services a duplicate copy of a complaint relating to patient care or facility operation.

A health maintenance organization shall annually, on or before March 1, submit to the director, in a form prescribed by the director, a report covering the preceding calendar year. The health maintenance organization shall provide a copy of this report to the commissioner of health and social services. The report submitted under this subsection must include

a description of the procedures used in its complaint system;

the total number of complaints handled through its complaint system and a compilation of the causes underlying the complaints filed; and

the number, amount, and disposition of malpractice claims made by an enrollee that were settled during the year by the health maintenance organization; information concerning malpractice claims shall be held confidential by the director and by the commissioner of health and social services, and is not subject to public disclosure.

The director or the commissioner of health and social services may, at any time during normal business hours, examine the complaint system in any place of business of the health maintenance organization in order to determine compliance with this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1990)

Sec. 21.86.110.
Recovery of health care costs.

If a health maintenance organization determines that an enrollee has received health care services that the enrollee is not entitled to receive under the terms of the health maintenance agreement, the organization may not recover an amount above the actual cost of providing the health care service. This section does not apply if the enrollee gave or withheld information to the health maintenance organization with the intent to mislead or misinform the organization as to the enrollee’s right to receive the health care services.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1990)

Sec. 21.86.120.
Return of agreement.

A person who enters into a health maintenance agreement may return the agreement to the health maintenance organization or the agent from whom it was purchased within 10 days of the delivery of the agreement to the person if the person is not satisfied for any reason.
Upon return of the agreement, the health maintenance organization shall promptly refund the fee paid for the agreement.
Notice of the substance of this section must be printed on the face of the agreement.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1990)

Sec. 21.86.130.
Investments.

With the exception of investments made under
AS

21.86.030

, a health maintenance organization’s money may only be invested as allowed by AS 21.21 for the investment of legal reserves of a life insurer.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1990)

Sec. 21.86.140.
Protection against insolvency.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, a health maintenance organization shall deposit with the director, or with an organization or trustee acceptable to the director through which a custodial or controlled account is used, cash, securities, or a combination of these or other means acceptable to the director in the manner and amount required by this section.

Except as provided in (d) and (e) of this section, the deposit amount for a health maintenance organization that begins operation after June 8, 1990 is the greater of 10 percent of its estimated expenditures for health care services for its first year of operation, twice its estimated average monthly uncovered expenditures for its first year of operation, or $250,000. Except as provided in (d) and (e) of this section, at the beginning of each succeeding year of operation, the organization shall deposit with the director, or organization or trustee, cash, securities, or a combination of these or other means acceptable to the director in an amount equal to four percent of its estimated annual uncovered expenditures for that year. Each year’s estimate, after the first year of operation, shall reasonably reflect the prior year’s operating experience and delivery arrangements.

Except as provided in (d) and (e) of this section, a health maintenance organization that is in operation on June 8, 1990 shall, on the first day of its fiscal year beginning six months or more after June 8, 1990, make a deposit equal to the greater of one percent of the preceding 12 months’ uncovered expenditures or $250,000. The organization shall, at the beginning of its second fiscal year after June 8, 1990, deposit an amount equal to two percent of the organization’s estimated annual uncovered expenditures for that year. At the beginning of its third fiscal year, the organization shall deposit an amount equal to three percent of its estimated annual uncovered expenditures for that year. At the beginning of the fourth fiscal year and subsequent years, the organization shall deposit an amount equal to four percent of its estimated annual uncovered expenditures for that year. Each year’s estimate, after the first year of operation, must reasonably reflect the prior year’s operating experience and delivery arrangements.

The director may waive the deposit requirements in (b) and (c) of this section if the director is satisfied that

the organization has sufficient net worth and an adequate history of generating net income to assure its financial viability for the next year;

the organization’s performance and obligations are guaranteed by another organization that has sufficient net worth and an adequate history of generating net income; or

the assets of the organization, or its contracts with insurers, hospital or medical service corporations, governments, or other organizations, are reasonably sufficient to assure the performance of its obligations.

The annual deposit requirements of (b) and (c) of this section do not apply if

a health maintenance organization has achieved a net worth, not including land, buildings, and equipment, of at least $1,000,000 or has achieved a net worth, including land, buildings, and equipment, of at least $5,000,000;

the total amount of the health maintenance organization’s accumulated deposit is equal to 25 percent of its estimated annual uncovered expenditures for the next calendar year, or is equal to the capital and surplus requirements for the formation for admittance of a health insurer in this state, whichever is less;

a health maintenance organization has a guaranteeing organization that

does not sponsor any other health maintenance organization; and

has been in operation for at least

five years and has a net worth, not including land, buildings, and equipment, of at least $1,000,000; or

10 years and has a net worth, including land, buildings, and equipment, of at least $5,000,000; or

a health maintenance organization has a guaranteeing organization that sponsors more than one health maintenance organization and that

has been in operation for at least

five years and has a net worth that is at least that required by (3)(B)(i) of this subsection multiplied by a number equal to the number of organizations sponsored; or

10 years and has a net worth that is at least that required by (3)(B)(ii) of this subsection multiplied by a number equal to the number of organizations sponsored; or

has, for each organization sponsored, a net worth at least equal to the capital and surplus requirement for a health insurer.

All deposit income belongs to the depositing health maintenance organization, and shall be paid to it as it becomes available. A health maintenance organization that has made a deposit of securities may withdraw that deposit, or any part of it, after making a substitute deposit of cash, securities, or a combination of these or other means of equal amount and value. Substitution of securities must have prior approval by the director.

In a year in which an annual deposit is not required of a health maintenance organization under this section, at the organization’s request the director shall reduce the required, previously accumulated deposit by $100,000 for each $250,000 of net worth in excess of the amount that allows the organization not to make the annual deposit. If the amount of an organization’s net worth is reduced to less than the amount that allowed a reduction in accumulated deposit, the organization shall immediately redeposit $100,000 for each $250,000 of reduction in net worth, except that the total deposit need not exceed the maximum required under this section.

A health maintenance organization that obtains a certificate of authority shall have and maintain a capital account of at least $100,000 in addition to deposit requirements under this section. The capital account must equal at least $100,000 after deducting accrued liabilities, and must be in the form of cash, securities, or a combination of these or other means acceptable to the director.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1990; am § 103 ch 56 SLA 1996)

Sec. 21.86.150.
Prohibited practices.

A health maintenance organization or a representative of a health maintenance organization may not cause or knowingly permit a person to provide, on behalf of the health maintenance organization, health care services that the person is not licensed to provide.

A health maintenance organization, or a representative of a health maintenance organization, may not cause or knowingly permit the use of advertising that is untrue or misleading, solicitation that is untrue or misleading, or a form of evidence of coverage that is deceptive. For purposes of this chapter,

a statement or item of information is considered to be untrue if it does not conform to fact in any respect that is or might be significant to an enrollee of, or person considering enrollment with, a health maintenance organization;

a statement or item of information is considered to be misleading, whether or not it is untrue, if, in the total context in which the statement is made or the item of information is communicated, the statement or item of information might be understood by a reasonable person, not possessing special knowledge regarding health care coverage, as indicating a benefit or advantage or the absence of an exclusion, limitation, or disadvantage of possible significance to an enrollee of, or person considering enrollment in, a health maintenance organization if the benefit or advantage or absence of limitation, exclusion, or disadvantage does not exist;

an evidence of coverage is considered to be deceptive if the evidence of coverage taken as a whole, and with consideration given to typography and format, as well as to language, might cause a reasonable person, not possessing special knowledge regarding health maintenance organizations or an evidence of coverage, to expect benefits, services, charges, or other advantages that the evidence of coverage does not provide or that the health maintenance organization issuing the evidence of coverage does not regularly make available for an enrollee covered under the evidence of coverage.

AS 21.36 applies to health maintenance organizations and to an evidence of coverage except to the extent that the director determines that the nature of health maintenance organizations and the evidence of coverage renders that chapter clearly inappropriate.

A health maintenance organization may not cancel or refuse to review an enrollee, except for

reasons stated in the organization’s regulations applicable to all enrollees;

failure to pay the charge for the enrollee’s coverage; or

other reasons adopted by the director by regulation.

Unless it is licensed as an insurer, a health maintenance organization may not refer to itself as an insurer or use a name deceptively similar to the name or description of an insurance or surety corporation doing business in the state.

A person may not use the phrase “health maintenance organization” or “HMO” in the course of the person’s operations unless the person possesses a valid certificate of authority issued under this chapter.

A health maintenance organization that offers, renews, issues for delivery, or delivers in this state a health care insurance plan in the group market that does not impose a preexisting condition exclusion with respect to a particular coverage option under the plan may impose an affiliation period for that coverage option only if the affiliation period

is applied uniformly without regard to a health status factor;

does not exceed two months for new enrollees and three months for late enrollees;

begins on the enrollment date; and

runs concurrently with any waiting period under the plan.

A health maintenance organization may use a method other than a preexisting condition exclusion or an affiliation period to lessen the risk of adverse selection only with prior written approval of the director.

A health maintenance organization, including a health maintenance organization operating a managed care plan, or a representative of a health maintenance organization may not cause, request, or knowingly permit

the imposition of limits regarding

criticism by a health care provider of health care services provided by the health maintenance organization; or

written or oral communications between a health care provider and an enrollee regarding health care services;

the employment of a health care provider to be terminated unless the provider receives written notice of the cause for the termination before being terminated;

denial of health care coverage for an enrollee unless the enrollee has been examined by at least two physicians; or

financial incentives to be given or offered to a provider for denying or delaying health care services.

A utilization review decision to deny, reduce, or terminate a health care benefit or to deny payment for a health care service because that service is not medically necessary may only be made by a health care provider trained in that specialty or subspecialty and licensed to practice in this state after consultation with the covered person’s health care provider.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1990; am § 100 ch 81 SLA 1997; am § 5 ch 60 SLA 1998)

Sec. 21.86.160.
Regulation of agents.

The director may adopt regulations necessary to provide for the licensing of health maintenance organization agents.

The director may, by regulation, exempt certain classes of persons from the requirement of obtaining an agent license if

the function the class performs does not require special competence or trustworthiness, or the regulatory surveillance made possible by licensing; or

other existing safeguards make regulation through licensing unnecessary.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1990)